Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-2015
Public Counsel; proceedings, opinion, expression; not reviewable by court; not subject to testify or produce evidence.

(1) No proceeding, opinion, or expression of the Public Counsel shall be reviewable in any court. Neither the Public Counsel nor any member of the Public Counsel's staff shall be required to testify or produce evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding concerning matters within the Public Counsel's official cognizance, except in a proceeding brought to enforce the Office of Public Counsel Act.

(2) Reports of investigations conducted by the Public Counsel are not public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 14, p. 2883;

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,253;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 15.